tex/context/patterns/mkii/lang-bg.pat
4ццб4
ццв4
4ццг4
4ццд4
ццж4
ццз4
4ццк4
ццл4
ццм4
ццн4
4ццп4
ццр4
ццс4
4ццт4
ццф4
ццх4
4ццц4
4ццч4
ццш4
ццщ4
4ц3ч4
8цч.
4цчб4
цчв4
4цчг4
4цчд4
цчж4
цчз4
4цчк4
цчл4
цчм4
цчн4
4цчп4
цчр4
цчс4
4цчт4
цчф4
цчх4
4цчц4
4цчч4
цчш4
цчщ4
2ц3ш
8цш.
4цшб4
4цшг4
4цшд4
4цшж
4цшз
4цшк4
4цшп4
4цшт4
4цшц4
4цшч4
4цшш
2ц3щ
8цщ.
4цщб4
4цщг4
4цщд4
4цщк4
4цщп4
4цщт4
4цщц4
4цщч4
4цщщ
4ч3б4
8чб.
4чбб4
чбв4
4чбг4
4чбд4
чбж4
чбз4
4чбк4
чбл4
чбм4
чбн4
4чбп4
чбр4
чбс4
4чбт4
чбф4
чбх4
4чбц4
4чбч4
чбш4
чбщ4
2ч3в4
8чв.
4чвб4
4чвв
4чвг4
4чвд4
4чвк4
4чвп4
4чвт4
4чвф
4чвц4
4чвч4
4ч3г4
8чг.
4чгб4
чгв4
4чгг4
4чгд4
чгж4
чгз4
4чгк4
чгл4
чгм4
чгн4
4чгп4
чгр4
чгс4
4чгт4
чгф4
чгх4
4чгц4
4чгч4
чгш4
чгщ4
4ч3д4
8чд.
4чдб4
чдв4
4чдг4
4чдд4
чдж4
чдз4
4чдк4
чдл4
чдм4
чдн4
4чдп4
чдр4
чдс4
4чдт4
чдф4
чдх4
4чдц4
4чдч4
чдш4
чдщ4
2ч3ж4
8чж.
4чжб4
4чжг4
4чжд4
4чжж
4чжк4
4чжп4
4чжс
4чжт4
4чжф
4чжх
4чжц4
4чжч4
4чжш
2ч3з4
8чз.
4чзб4
4чзг4
4чзд4
4чзз
4чзк4
4чзп4
4чзс
4чзт4
4чзф
4чзх
4чзц4
4чзч4
4чзш
чй4
4ч3к4
8чк.
4чкб4
чкв4
4чкг4
4чкд4
чкж4
чкз4
4чкк4
чкл4
чкм4
чкн4
4чкп4
чкр4
чкс4
4чкт4
чкф4
чкх4
4чкц4
4чкч4
чкш4
чкщ4
2ч3л4
8чл.
4члб4
4члг4
4члд4
4члк4
4члл
4члп4
4члт4
4члц4
4члч4
2ч3м4
8чм.
4чмб4
4чмг4
4чмд4
4чмк4
4чмм
4чмп4
4чмт4
4чмц4
4чмч4
2ч3н4
8чн.
4чнб4
4чнг4
4чнд4
4чнк4
4чнн
4чнп4
4чнт4
4чнц4
4чнч4
4ч3п4
8чп.
4чпб4
чпв4
4чпг4
4чпд4
чпж4
чпз4
4чпк4
чпл4
чпм4
чпн4
4чпп4
чпр4
чпс4
4чпт4
чпф4
чпх4
4чпц4
4чпч4
чпш4
чпщ4
2ч3р4
8чр.
4чрб4
4чрг4
4чрд4
4чрк4
4чрп4
4чрр
4чрт4
4чрц4
4чрч4
2ч3с
8чс.
4чсб4
4чсг4
4чсд4
4чсж
4чсз
4чск4
4чсп4
4чсс
4чст4
4чсц4
4чсч4
4ч3т4
8чт.
4чтб4
чтв4
4чтг4
4чтд4
чтж4
чтз4
4чтк4
чтл4
чтм4
чтн4
4чтп4
чтр4
чтс4
4чтт4
чтф4
чтх4
4чтц4
4чтч4
чтш4
чтщ4
2ч3ф
8чф.
4чфб4
4чфв
4чфг4
4чфд4
4чфж
4чфз
4чфк4
4чфп4
4чфт4
4чфф
4чфц4
4чфч4
2ч3х
8чх.
4чхб4
4чхг4
4чхд4
4чхж
4чхз
4чхк4
4чхп4
4чхт4
4чхх
4чхц4
4чхч4
4ч3ц4
8чц.
4чцб4
чцв4
4чцг4
4чцд4
чцж4
чцз4
4чцк4
чцл4
чцм4
чцн4
4чцп4
чцр4
чцс4
4чцт4
чцф4
чцх4
4чцц4
4чцч4
чцш4
чцщ4
4ч3ч4
8чч.
4ччб4
ччв4
4ччг4
4ччд4
ччж4
ччз4
4ччк4
ччл4
ччм4
ччн4
4ччп4
ччр4
ччс4
4ччт4
ччф4
ччх4
4ччц4
4ччч4
ччш4
ччщ4
2ч3ш
8чш.
4чшб4
4чшг4
4чшд4
4чшж
4чшз
4чшк4
4чшп4
4чшт4
4чшц4
4чшч4
4чшш
2ч3щ
8чщ.
4чщб4
4чщг4
4чщд4
4чщк4
4чщп4
4чщт4
4чщц4
4чщч4
4чщщ
2ш3б4
8шб.
4шбб
4шбж4
4шбз4
4шбк
4шбп
4шбс4
4шбт
4шбф4
4шбх4
4шбц
4шбч
4шбш4
2ш3в4
8шв.
4швв
4швж4
4швз4
4швф
4швш4
2ш3г4
8шг.
4шгг
4шгж4
4шгз4
4шгк
4шгп
4шгс4
4шгт
4шгф4
4шгх4
4шгц
4шгч
4шгш4
2ш3д4
8шд.
4шдб
4шдг
4шдд
4шдж4
4шдз4
4шдк
4шдп
4шдс4
4шдт
4шдф4
4шдх4
4шдц
4шдч
4шдш4
4ш3ж4
8шж.
шжб4
шжв4
шжг4
шжд4
4шжж4
4шжз4
шжк4
шжл4
шжм4
шжн4
шжп4
шжр4
4шжс4
шжт4
4шжф4
4шжх4
шжц4
шжч4
4шжш4
шжщ4
4ш3з4
8шз.
шзб4
шзв4
шзг4
шзд4
4шзж4
4шзз4
шзк4
шзл4
шзм4
шзн4
шзп4
шзр4
4шзс4
шзт4
4шзф4
4шзх4
шзц4
шзч4
4шзш4
шзщ4
шй4
2ш3к
8шк.
4шкб
4шкг
4шкд
4шкж4
4шкз4
4шкк
4шкс4
4шкф4
4шкх4
4шкш4
2ш3л4
8шл.
4шлж4
4шлз4
4шлл
4шлш4
2ш3м4
8шм.
4шмж4
4шмз4
4шмм
4шмш4
2ш3н4
8шн.
4шнж4
4шнз4
4шнн
4шнш4
2ш3п
8шп.
4шпб
4шпг
4шпд
4шпж4
4шпз4
4шпп
4шпс4
4шпф4
4шпх4
4шпш4
2ш3р4
8шр.
4шрж4
4шрз4
4шрр
4шрш4
2ш3с
8шс.
4шсж4
4шсз4
4шсс
4шсш4
2ш3т
8шт.
4штб
4штг
4штд
4штж4
4штз4
4штк
4штп
4штс4
4штт
4штф4
4штх4
4штц
4штч
4штш4
2ш3ф
8шф.
4шфв
4шфж4
4шфз4
4шфф
4шфш4
2ш3х
8шх.
4шхж4
4шхз4
4шхх
4шхш4
2ш3ц
8шц.
4шцб
4шцг
4шцд
4шцж4
4шцз4
4шцк
4шцп
4шцс4
4шцт
4шцф4
4шцх4
4шцц
4шцч
4шцш4
2ш3ч
8шч.
4шчб
4шчг
4шчд
4шчж4
4шчз4
4шчк
4шчп
4шчс4
4шчт
4шчф4
4шчх4
4шчц
4шчч
4шчш4
4ш3ш4
8шш.
шшб4
шшв4
шшг4
шшд4
4шшж4
4шшз4
шшк4
шшл4
шшм4
шшн4
шшп4
шшр4
шшс4
шшт4
шшф4
шшх4
шшц4
шшч4
4шшш4
шшщ4
2ш3щ
8шщ.
4шщж4
4шщз4
4шщш4
4шщщ
2щ3б4
8щб.
4щбб
4щбк
4щбп
4щбт
4щбц
4щбч
4щбщ4
2щ3в4
8щв.
4щвв
4щвф
4щвщ4
2щ3г4
8щг.
4щгг
4щгк
4щгп
4щгт
4щгц
4щгч
4щгщ4
2щ3д4
8щд.
4щдб
4щдг
4щдд
4щдк
4щдп
4щдт
4щдц
4щдч
4щдщ4
2щ3ж4
8щж.
4щжж
4щжс
4щжф
4щжх
4щжш
4щжщ4
2щ3з4
8щз.
4щзз
4щзс
4щзф
4щзх
4щзш
4щзщ4
щй4
2щ3к
8щк.
4щкб
4щкг
4щкд
4щкк
4щкщ4
2щ3л4
8щл.
4щлл
4щлщ4
2щ3м4
8щм.
4щмм
4щмщ4
2щ3н4
8щн.
4щнн
4щнщ4
2щ3п
8щп.
4щпб
4щпг
4щпд
4щпп
4щпщ4
2щ3р4
8щр.
4щрр
4щрщ4
2щ3с
8щс.
4щсж
4щсз
4щсс
4щсщ4
2щ3т
8щт.
4щтб
4щтг
4щтд
4щтк
4щтп
4щтт
4щтц
4щтч
4щтщ4
2щ3ф
8щф.
4щфв
4щфж
4щфз
4щфф
4щфщ4
2щ3х
8щх.
4щхж
4щхз
4щхх
4щхщ4
2щ3ц
8щц.
4щцб
4щцг
4щцд
4щцк
4щцп
4щцт
4щцц
4щцч
4щцщ4
2щ3ч
8щч.
4щчб
4щчг
4щчд
4щчк
4щчп
4щчт
4щчц
4щчч
4щчщ4
2щ3ш
8щш.
4щшж
4щшз
4щшш
4щшщ4
4щ3щ4
8щщ.
щщб4
щщв4
щщг4
щщд4
щщж4
щщз4
щщк4
щщл4
щщм4
щщн4
щщп4
щщр4
щщс4
щщт4
щщф4
щщх4
щщц4
щщч4
щщш4
4щщщ4
ъ1
ю1
я1}
